Wyoming, session 2026, HB0119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 8-1-111 is created to read:

8-1-111. Limitations on the application of foreign
law.

HB0119

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0261
(a) As used in this section, "foreign law" means any
law, legal code or legal system of a jurisdiction outside
of any state or territory of the United States, including
the law, legal code or legal system of any international
organization or international tribunal.

(b) The legislature finds that the application of
foreign law shall be circumscribed when the application of
foreign law would violate the fundamental liberties, rights
and privileges guaranteed by the United States constitution
and the Wyoming constitution, including but not limited to
equal protection, due process of the laws, the free
exercise of religion, the freedoms of speech and the press,
the right of privacy and the right of marriage.

(c) Any ruling or decision of a state court,
arbitration panel, tribunal or administrative agency of
Wyoming that is based, in whole or in part, on foreign law
shall be void and unenforceable if the ruling or decision
allows the application of any foreign law that denies the
parties the fundamental liberties, rights and privileges
guaranteed under the United States constitution and the
Wyoming constitution.
HB0119

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0261

(d) The limitation in subsection (c) of this section
shall not be construed to:

(i) Limit the application of the common law as
specified in W.S. 8-1-101;

(ii) Limit the application of the law of any
federally recognized Indian tribe whose reservations are
located in Wyoming, in accordance with state, tribal and
federal law;

(iii) Disapprove or abrogate any existing
opinion of the Wyoming supreme court;

(iv) Limit adjudication of ecclesiastical
matters of a religious organization, including the
selection, appointment, discipline or removal of clergy or
the adoption, amendment or interpretation of religious
doctrine;

HB0119

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0261
(v) Apply to any person that voluntarily agrees
to be subjected to foreign law or to the jurisdiction of a
foreign court;

(vi) Apply where federal law preempts state law,
including obligations under treaties or international
agreements;

(vii) Impair any contract or other agreement
entered into by two (2) or more persons.

Section 2. W.S. 1-7-103(a) and by creating a new
subsection (d) is amended to read:

1-7-103. Change of venue in civil actions;
limitation.

(a) For any civil action brought in an incorrect
venue, the district court may, on its own or upon motion of
the parties, order the action to be transferred to a court
that would be a proper venue, except as provided by
subsection (d) of this section.

HB0119

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0261
(d) No court shall transfer any civil action to a
proper venue under this section if the transfer would
result in the application of foreign law as defined by W.S.
8-1-111(a) that would violate or likely violate the
fundamental liberties, rights and privileges of the parties
guaranteed under the United States constitution or the
Wyoming constitution.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0119